Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 18 Residential Landlord and Tenant Act
34-18-24.
Tenant to maintain dwelling unit.

A tenant shall:

Comply with all obligations primarily imposed upon tenants by applicable provisions of building and housing codes materially affecting health and safety;

Keep that part of the premises that he or she occupies and uses as clean and safe as the condition of the premises permit;

Dispose from his or her dwelling unit all ashes, garbage, rubbish, and other waste in a clean and safe manner;

Keep all plumbing fixtures in the dwelling unit or used by the tenant as clean as their condition permits;

Use in a reasonable manner all electrical, plumbing, sanitary, heating, ventilating, air-conditioning, and other facilities and appliances, including elevators, in the premises;

Not deliberately or negligently destroy, deface, damage, impair, or remove any part of the premises or knowingly permit any person to do so;

Conduct himself or herself, and require other persons on the premises with his or her consent to conduct themselves, in a manner that will not disturb his or her neighbors’ peaceful enjoyment of the premises;

Refrain from using any part of the premises in a manner such as would constitute the maintaining of a narcotics nuisance under the provisions of §

21-28-4.06

;

Refrain from using any part of the premises or any public property adjacent thereto for the manufacture, sale, or delivery of a controlled substance or from possessing on the premises or any public property adjacent thereto with the intent to manufacture, sell, or deliver a controlled substance classified in schedule I or schedule II of chapter 28 of title 21; and

Refrain from any crime of violence on the premises or on any public property adjacent to said premises. A “crime of violence” means and includes any of the following crimes or an attempt to commit any of the following crimes; murder, manslaughter, arson, rape, sexual assault, mayhem, kidnapping, assault with a dangerous weapon, assault or battery involving grave bodily injury, and a felony assault with intent to commit any offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 649, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 229, § 1.

34-18-25.
Rules and regulations.

A landlord, from time to time, may adopt a rule or regulation, however described, concerning the tenant’s use and occupancy of the premises. It is enforceable against the tenant only if:

Its purpose is to promote the convenience, safety, or welfare of the tenants on the premises, preserve the landlord’s property from abusive use, or make a fair distribution of services and facilities held out for the tenants generally;

It is reasonably related to the purpose of which it is adopted;

It is sufficiently explicit in its prohibition, direction, or limitation of the tenant’s conduct to fairly inform the tenant of what he or she must or must not do to comply;

It applies to all tenants in the premises in a fair manner;

It is not for the purpose of evading the obligations of the landlord; and

The tenant has notice of it at the time he or she enters into the rental agreement, or when it is adopted.

If a rule or regulation is adopted after the tenant enters into the rental agreement that works a substantial modification of his or her bargain, it is not valid unless the tenant consents to it in writing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-26.
Access.

A tenant shall not unreasonably withhold consent to the landlord to enter into the dwelling unit in order to inspect the premises, make necessary or agreed repairs, decorations, alterations, or improvements, supply necessary or agreed services, or exhibit the dwelling unit to prospective or actual purchasers, mortgagees, tenants, workers, or contractors.

A landlord may enter the dwelling unit without consent of the tenant in case of emergency, or, during any absence of the tenant in excess of seven (7) days, if reasonably necessary for the protection of the property.

A landlord shall not abuse the right of access or use it to harass the tenant. Except in case of emergency or unless it is impracticable to do so, the landlord shall give the tenant at least two (2) days’ notice of his or her intent to enter and may enter only at reasonable times.

A landlord has no other right of access except:

Pursuant to court order;

As permitted by §

34-18-39

; or

Unless the tenant has abandoned or surrendered the premises.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-27.
Tenant to use and occupy.

Unless otherwise agreed, a tenant shall occupy his or her dwelling unit only as a dwelling unit. The rental agreement may require that the tenant notify the landlord of any anticipated extended absence from the premises in excess of ten (10) days no later than the first day of the extended absence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-28.
Noncompliance by the landlord in general.

Except as provided by this chapter, if there is a noncompliance by the landlord with the rental agreement or a noncompliance with §

34-18-22

materially affecting health and safety, the tenant may deliver a written notice to the landlord specifying the acts and omissions constituting the breach and that the rental agreement will terminate upon a date not less than thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice if the breach is not remedied in twenty (20) days, and the rental agreement shall terminate as provided in the notice subject to the following:

If the breach is remediable by repairs, the payment of damages or otherwise and the landlord adequately remedies the breach before the date specified in the notice, the rental agreement shall not terminate by reason of the breach.

If substantially the same act or omission which constituted a prior noncompliance of which notice was given recurs within six (6) months, the tenant may terminate the rental agreement upon at least fourteen (14) days’ written notice specifying the breach and the date of termination of the rental agreement.

The tenant may not terminate for a condition caused by the deliberate or negligent act or omission of the tenant, a member of his or her family, or other person on the premises with his or her consent.

Except as provided in this chapter, the tenant may recover actual damages and obtain injunctive relief for noncompliance by the landlord with the rental agreement or §

34-18-22

. If the landlord’s noncompliance is willful, the tenant may recover reasonable attorney’s fees.

The remedy provided in subsection (b) of this section is in addition to any right of the tenant arising under subsection (a).

If the rental agreement is terminated, the landlord shall return all security recoverable by the tenant under §

34-18-19

and all prepaid rent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-29.
Failure to deliver possession.

If the landlord fails to deliver possession of the dwelling unit to the tenant as provided in §

34-18-21

, rent abates until possession is delivered and the tenant may:

Terminate the rental agreement upon at least five (5) days’ written notice to the landlord, and, upon termination, the landlord shall return all prepaid rent and security; or

Demand performance of the rental agreement by the landlord and, if the tenant elects, bring action for possession of the dwelling unit against the landlord.

If a person’s failure to deliver possession is willful and not in good faith, an aggrieved person may recover from that person an amount not more than three (3) months’ periodic rent or threefold the actual damages sustained, whichever is greater, and reasonable attorney’s fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-30.
Self-help for limited repairs.

If the landlord fails to comply with subsection of §

34-18-22(a)(1)

, (2), (4), (5), or (6), and the reasonable cost of compliance is less than one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125), the tenant may cause repairs to be done in a skilled manner, in compliance with applicable state and local codes, and deduct from his or her rent the actual and reasonable cost or the fair and reasonable value of the repairs if:

The tenant notifies the landlord of his or her intention to correct the condition at the landlord’s expense; and

The landlord fails to comply within twenty (20) days, or fails to demonstrate ongoing, good faith efforts to comply, after being notified by the tenant in writing; or, in the case of emergency, the landlord either cannot be reached by the tenant, or the landlord fails to comply as promptly as conditions require; and

The tenant submits an itemized statement to the landlord of the cost or the fair and reasonable value of the repairs made.

A tenant may not repair at the landlord’s expense if the condition was caused by the deliberate or negligent act or omission of the tenant, a member of his or her family, or other person on the premises with his or her consent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-31.
Wrongful failure to supply heat, water, hot water, or essential services.

If, contrary to the rental agreement or §

34-18-22

, the landlord willfully or negligently fails to supply heat, running water, hot water, electric, gas, or other essential service, the tenant may give reasonable notice to the landlord specifying the breach and may:

Take reasonable and appropriate measures to secure reasonable amounts of heat, running water, hot water, electric, gas, and other essential service during the period of the landlord’s noncompliance and deduct their actual and reasonable costs from the periodic rent; or

Recover damages based upon the diminution in the fair rental value of the dwelling unit; or

Procure reasonable substitute housing during the period of the landlord’s noncompliance, in which case the tenant is excused from paying rent for the period of the landlord’s noncompliance.

In addition to the remedy provided in subsection (a)(3) of this section, the tenant may recover the actual and reasonable cost or fair and reasonable value of the substitute housing not in excess of an amount equal to the periodic rent, and in any case under subsection (a) of this section, may recover reasonable attorney’s fees.

If the tenant proceeds under this section, he or she may not proceed under §

34-18-28

or §

34-18-30

as to that breach.

Rights of the tenant under this section do not arise until he or she has given notice to the landlord, nor does this section apply if the condition was caused by the deliberate or negligent act or omission of the tenant, a member of his or her family, or other person on the premises with his or her consent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-32.
Landlord’s noncompliance as defense to action for possession or rent.

In an action for possession based upon nonpayment of rent or in an action for rent when the tenant is in possession, the tenant may counterclaim for any amount he or she may recover under the rental agreement or this chapter. In that event, the court, from time to time, may order the tenant to pay into court all or part of the rent accrued and thereafter accruing, and shall determine the amount due to each party. The party to whom a net amount is owed shall be paid first from the money paid into court, and the balance by the other party. If no rent remains due after application of this section, judgment shall be entered for the tenant in the action for possession. If the defense or counterclaim by the tenant is frivolous or without any basis in fact, the landlord may recover reasonable attorney’s fees.

In an action for rent when the tenant is not in possession, he or she may counterclaim as provided in subsection (a) of this section, but is not required to pay any rent into court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-33.
Fire or casualty damage.

If the dwelling unit or premises are damaged or destroyed by fire or casualty to an extent that enjoyment of the dwelling unit is substantially impaired, the tenant may:

Immediately vacate the premises and notify the landlord in writing within fourteen (14) days thereafter of his or her intention to terminate the rental agreement, in which case the rental agreement terminates as of the date of vacating; or

If continued occupancy is lawful, vacate any part of the dwelling unit rendered unusable by the fire or casualty, in which case the tenants’ liability for rent is reduced in proportion to the diminution in the fair rental value of the dwelling unit.

If the rental agreement is terminated the landlord shall return all security recoverable under §

34-18-19

and all prepaid rent. Accounting for rent in the event of termination or apportionment shall be made as of the date of the fire or casualty.

This section shall not be construed to limit the right of the landlord to recover in an action in tort damages resulting from a fire or other casualty damage caused either negligently or deliberately by the tenant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-34.
Tenant’s remedies for landlord’s unlawful ouster, exclusion, or diminution of service.

If a landlord unlawfully removes or excludes the tenant from the premises or willfully diminishes services to the tenant by interrupting or causing the interruption of heat, running water, hot water, electric, gas, or other essential service, the tenant may recover possession or terminate the rental agreement and, in either case, recover an amount not more than three (3) months periodic rent or threefold the actual damages sustained by him or her, whichever is greater, and reasonable attorney’s fees. If the rental agreement is terminated the landlord shall return all security recoverable under §

34-18-19

and all prepaid rent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-35.
Eviction for nonpayment of rent.

If any part of the stipulated rent is due and in arrears for fifteen (15) days, the landlord shall send a written notice, in a form substantially similar to that provided in §

34-18-56(a)

, specifying the amount of the rent which is fifteen (15) days in arrears, making demand for the rent, and notifying the tenant that unless he or she cures the breach within five (5) days of the date of mailing of the notice, the rental agreement shall terminate, and the landlord shall commence an eviction action in the appropriate district court or housing court.

If the tenant fails to cure his or her breach by paying the stipulated rent in arrears within five (5) days of the date of mailing of the notice, the landlord may commence an eviction action against the tenant, which shall be filed no earlier than the sixth (6th) day after mailing of the written demand notice. The action shall be commenced by filing a “Complaint for Eviction for Nonpayment of Rent” in the appropriate court in the form provided in §

34-18-56(d)

.

The summons for eviction for nonpayment of rent shall specify the date for hearing and be in the form provided in §

34-18-56(g)

. The summons shall specify that the defendant may file and serve his or her answer prior to or at the time of hearing, and that if he or she fails to answer or appear at the hearing, he or she shall be defaulted.

If the defendant files his or her answer and commences discovery prior to the hearing, and it appears, for good cause shown, that the defendant will not be able to conduct his or her defense without the benefit of discovery, the court may continue the hearing to allow a reasonable time for the completion of discovery. In the case of such a continuance, the court may, in its discretion, order interim rent, or other remedy, to be paid to preserve the status quo pending hearing. Except as provided in this chapter, the landlord may recover possession and actual damages. In cases where the tenant had received a demand notice pursuant to subsection (a) within the six (6) months immediately preceding the filing of the action, and the tenant’s nonpayment was willful, the landlord may also recover a reasonable attorney’s fee.

The tenant shall have the right to cure his or her failure to pay rent by tendering the full amount of rent prior to commencement of suit. If the tenant has not received a notice pursuant to subsection (a) of this section within the six (6) months immediately preceding the filing of the action, the tenant shall have the right to cure his or her failure to pay rent after commencement of suit by tendering the full amount of rent in arrears, together with court costs, at the time of hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-36.
Eviction for noncompliance with rental agreement.

Except as provided in this chapter, if there is a material noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement or a noncompliance with §

34-18-24

materially affecting health and safety, the landlord shall deliver a written demand notice to the tenant, in a form substantially similar to that provided in §

34-18-56(b)

, specifying:

The acts and/or omissions constituting the breach of the rental agreement or of §

34-18-24

;

The acts, repairs, or payment of damages, which are necessary to remedy the breach; and

That unless the breach is remedied within twenty (20) days of mailing of the notice the rental agreement shall terminate upon a specified date, which shall not be less than twenty-one (21) days after the mailing of the notice.

Unless it is a violation of §

34-18-24(8)

, (9), or (10), if the tenant adequately remedies the breach before the date specified in the notice, the rental agreement shall not terminate. If the breach is not remedied, the landlord may commence an eviction action, which shall be filed no earlier than the first day following the termination date specified in the written demand notice. The action shall be initiated by filing a “Complaint for Eviction for Reason Other Than for Nonpayment of Rent” in the appropriate court according to the form in §

34-18-56(e)

.

The summons shall be in the form provided in §

34-18-56(h)

and shall specify that the tenant has twenty (20) days from the date of service in which to file his or her answer to the complaint, and that if he or she fails to file his or her answer within that time, he or she will be defaulted. The matter may be assigned for hearing in accordance with the rules of procedure of the appropriate court.

Except as provided in this chapter, the landlord may recover possession, actual damages and obtain injunctive relief for noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement or §

34-18-24

. If the tenant’s noncompliance is willful, the landlord may recover reasonable attorney’s fees.

If substantially the same act or omission which constituted a prior noncompliance, of which good faith notice was given, recurs within six (6) months, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement upon at least twenty (20) days’ written notice, specifying the breach and the date of termination of the rental agreement. No allowance of time to remedy noncompliance shall be required.

If the tenant has violated §

34-18-24(8)

, (9), or (10), or if the tenant (i) is a seasonal tenant occupying the premises pursuant to a written lease agreement which commences no earlier than May 1st of the occupation year and expires no later than October 15th of the occupation year, or commences no earlier than September 1st and expires no later than June 1st of the next subsequent year, with no right of renewal or extension beyond the above dates; and (ii) has been charged with violating a municipal ordinance or has otherwise violated the terms of the rental agreement pertaining to legal occupancy or excessive noise or other disturbance of the peace, the landlord shall not be required to send a notice of noncompliance to the tenant and may immediately file a complaint for eviction in a form substantially similar to that provided in §

34-18-56(e)

and seek the relief set forth in subsection (d).

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 25; P.L. 1988, ch. 649, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 1.

34-18-37.
Termination of periodic tenancy.

The landlord or the tenant may terminate a week-to-week tenancy by a written notice, in a form substantially similar to that provided in §

34-18-56(c)

, delivered to the other at least ten (10) days before the termination date specified in the notice.

The landlord or the tenant may terminate a month-to-month tenancy or any periodic tenancy for more than a month or less than a year by a written notice, in a form substantially similar to that provided in §

34-18-56(c)

, delivered to the other at least thirty (30) days before the date specified in the notice.

The landlord or tenant may terminate a year-to-year tenancy by written notice, in a form substantially similar to that provided in §

34-18-56(c)

, delivered to the other at least three (3) months prior to the expiration of the occupation year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-38.
Eviction for unlawfully holding over after termination or expiration of tenancy.

If the tenant remains in possession without the landlord’s consent after expiration of the term of the rental agreement or after the termination of a periodic tenancy, the landlord may commence an eviction action, which may be filed no earlier than the first day following the expiration or termination of the tenancy. The action shall be commenced by filing a “Complaint for Eviction for Reason Other Than for Nonpayment of Rent,” which shall be filed in the appropriate court according to the form provided in §

34-18-56(e)

.

The summons shall be in the form provided in §

34-18-56(h)

and shall specify that the tenant has twenty (20) days from the date of service in which to file his or her answer to the complaint, and that if he or she fails to file his or her answer within that time, he or she will be defaulted. The matter may be assigned for hearing in accordance with the rules of procedure of the appropriate court.

If the tenant’s holdover is willful and not in good faith, the landlord may also recover, in addition to possession, an amount not more than three (3) months’ periodic rent or threefold the actual damages sustained by him or her, whichever is greater, and reasonable attorney’s fees. If the landlord consents to the tenant’s occupancy, the parties may agree to a definite term. If no term is specified, the term shall be week-to-week if the tenant pays on a week-to-week basis, and in all other cases, month-to-month.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-38.1.
Definitions for purpose of the eviction of tenants in residential foreclosed properties.

As used in §

34-18-38.2

, the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:

“Bona fide lease” or “bona fide tenancy” means a lease or tenancy shall not be considered bona fide unless:

The mortgagor, or the child, spouse, or parent of the mortgagor under the contract, is not the tenant; and

The lease or tenancy was the result of an arms-length transaction; and

The lease or tenancy requires the receipt of rent that is not substantially less than fair-market rent for the property, or the dwelling unit’s rent is reduced or subsidized due to a federal, state, or local subsidy.

“Entity” means a business organization, or any other kind of organization including, without limitation, a corporation, partnership, trust, limited liability corporation, limited liability partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, or any other category of organization, and any employee, agent, servant, or other representative of such entity.

“Eviction” means an action, without limitation, by a foreclosing owner of a housing accommodation that is intended to actually or constructively evict a tenant or otherwise compel a tenant to vacate such housing accommodation.

“Foreclosing owner” means an entity that holds title in any capacity, directly or indirectly, without limitation, whether in its own name, as trustee or as beneficiary, to a housing accommodation that has been foreclosed upon and either:

Held or owned a mortgage or other security interest in the housing accommodation at any point prior to the foreclosure of the housing accommodation or is the subsidiary, parent, trustee, or agent thereof; or

Is an institutional mortgagee that acquires or holds title to the housing accommodation within three (3) years of the filing of a foreclosure deed on the housing accommodation; or

Is the federal national mortgage association or the federal home loan mortgage corporation.

“Foreclosure” means an action to terminate a mortgagor’s interest in property by sale of property pursuant to a power of sale in a mortgage, as described in §

34-11-22

; or conveyance of the property by the mortgagor in lieu of foreclosure; or an action filed in court pursuant to §

34-27-1

.

“Housing accommodation” means a building or structure containing four (4) or fewer dwelling units, or part thereof of land appurtenant thereto, and any other real or personal property used, rented, or offered for rent for living or dwelling purposes, together with all services connected with the use or occupancy of such property.

“HUD” means the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development and any successor to such department.

“Institutional mortgagee” means an entity, or an entity that is the subsidiary, parent, trustee to such entity, that holds or owns mortgages or other security interests in three (3) or more housing accommodations or that acts as a mortgage servicer of three (3) or more mortgages of housing accommodations.

“Just cause” means one of the following:

The tenant has failed to pay rent in effect prior to the foreclosure, as long as the foreclosing owner notified the tenant in writing of the amount of rent that was to be paid and to whom it was to be paid;

The tenant has materially violated either an express or legally required obligation or covenant of the tenancy or occupancy, other than the obligation to surrender possession upon proper notice, and has failed to cure such violation within thirty (30) days after having received written notice thereof from the foreclosing owner;

The tenant is committing a nuisance in the unit; is permitting a nuisance to exist in the unit; is causing substantial damage to the unit; or is creating a substantial interference with the quiet enjoyment of other occupants;

The tenant is using, or permitting the unit to be used, for any illegal purpose;

The tenant, who had a written bona fide lease or other rental agreement that terminated, on or after July 1, 2014, has refused, after written request or demand by the foreclosing owner, to execute a written extension or renewal thereof for a further term of like duration and in such terms that are not inconsistent with this chapter;

The tenant has refused the foreclosing owner reasonable access to the unit for the purpose of making necessary repairs or improvement required by the laws of the United States, the state of Rhode Island or any subdivision thereof, or for the purpose of inspection as permitted or required by agreement or by law, or for the purpose of showing the unit to a prospective purchaser or mortgagee;

The foreclosing owner: (A) Seeks to permanently board up or demolish the premises because the premises has been cited by a state or local minimum housing code enforcement agency for substantial violations affecting the health and safety of tenants and it is economically not feasible for the foreclosing owner to eliminate the violations; or (B) Seeks to comply with a state or local minimum housing code enforcement agency that has cited the premises for substantial violations affecting the health and safety of tenants and it is not feasible to so comply without removing the tenant; or (C) Seeks to correct an illegal occupancy because the premises has been cited by a state or local minimum housing code enforcement agency or zoning official and it is not feasible to correct such illegal occupancy without removing the tenant; and provided further that nothing in this section shall limit the rights of a third-party owner to evict a tenant at the expiration of an existing lease.

“Mortgagee” means an entity to whom property is mortgaged, the mortgage creditor or lender including, but not limited to, mortgage services, lenders in a mortgage agreement and any agent, servant, or employee of the mortgagee, or any successor in interest or assignee of the mortgagee’s rights, interests, or obligations under the mortgage agreement.

“Mortgage servicer” means an entity that administers, or at any point administered, the mortgage; provided, however, that such administration shall include, but not be limited to, calculating principal and interest, collecting payments from the mortgager, acting as escrow agent, or foreclosing in the event of a default.

“Tenant” means a person or group of persons, who at the time of foreclosure, is entitled to occupy a housing accommodation pursuant to a bona fide lease or tenancy. A person who moves into the housing accommodation owned by the foreclosing owner, subsequent to the foreclosure sale, without the express written permission of the foreclosing owner, shall not be considered a tenant under this section.

“Unit” or “residential unit” means the room, or group of rooms, within a housing accommodation that is used, or intended for use, as a residence by one household.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 486, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 513, § 2.

34-18-38.2.
Just cause needed for eviction of foreclosed residential property tenants.

Notwithstanding any provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, a foreclosing owner shall not evict a tenant except for just cause, or unless a binding purchase-and-sale agreement has been executed for a bona fide third party to purchase the housing accommodation from a foreclosing owner, and the foreclosing owner has disclosed to the third-party purchaser that said purchaser may be responsible for evicting the current occupants of the housing accommodation after the sale occurs; or with respect to a housing accommodation in a housing accommodation insured by the Federal Housing Administration, unless HUD denies a request by any tenant for an occupied conveyance or if a tenant does not submit to HUD a request for continued occupancy before the deadline set forth in a notice to occupants of pending acquisition delivered to the tenant by the foreclosing owner.

Within thirty (30) days of the foreclosure, the foreclosing owner shall post in a prominent location in the building in which the rental housing unit is located, a written notice stating:

The names, addresses, telephone numbers, and telephone contact information of the foreclosing owner, the building manager, or other representative of the foreclosing owner responsible for the management of such building;

The address to which rent charges shall be sent;

That in order to remain on the premises as a tenant of the foreclosing owner, the household must submit, within thirty (30) days, a completed form to be provided with said written notice to the same address where rent charges shall be sent, said form to be substantially similar to the request for continued occupancy form used by HUD and shall contain an authorization to conduct a credit check of the person or persons submitting the form. This requirement shall be satisfied if the foreclosing owner or someone acting on his/her behalf has:

Posted the notice in a prominent location in the building;

Mailed the notice by first-class mail to each unit; and

Slid the notice under the door of each unit in the building a document stating the names, addresses, and telephone contact information of the foreclosing owner, the building manager or other representative of the foreclosing owner responsible for the management of such building, and stating the address to which rent and use and occupancy charges shall be sent.

A foreclosing owner shall not evict a tenant except for actions that constitute just cause, and:

A foreclosing owner shall not evict a tenant for the following actions that constitute just cause until thirty (30) days after the notice required by subsection (b) of this section is posted, mailed, and delivered:

The tenant has failed to pay the rent in effect prior to the foreclosure as long as the foreclosing owner notified the tenant in writing of the amount of rent that was to be paid and to whom it was to be paid;

The tenant has materially violated an obligation or covenant of the tenancy or occupancy, other than the obligation to surrender possession upon proper notice;

The tenant, who had a written bona fide lease or other rental agreement that terminated, on or after July 1, 2014, has refused, after written request or demand by the foreclosing owner, to execute a written extension or renewal thereof for a further term of like duration and in such terms that are not inconsistent with this section; and

The foreclosing owner: (A) Seeks to permanently board up or demolish the premises because the premises has been cited by a state or local minimum housing code enforcement agency for substantial violations affecting the health and safety of tenants and it is not economically feasible for the foreclosing owner to eliminate the violations; or (B) Seeks to comply with a state or local minimum housing code enforcement agency that has cited the premises for substantial violations affecting the health and safety of tenants and it is not feasible to so comply without removing the tenant; or (C) Seeks to correct an illegal occupancy because the premises has been cited by a state or local minimum housing code enforcement agency or zoning officials and it is not feasible to correct such illegal occupancy without evicting the tenant.

A foreclosing owner shall not evict a tenant for the following actions that constitute just cause until the notice required by subsection (b) is posted and delivered:

The tenant is committing a nuisance in the unit; is permitting a nuisance to exist in the unit; is causing substantial damage to the unit; or is creating a substantial interference with the quiet enjoyment of other occupants;

The tenant is using or permitting the unit to be used for any illegal purpose; and

The tenant has refused the foreclosing owner reasonable access to the unit for the purpose of making necessary repairs or improvements required by the laws of the United States, the state of Rhode Island or any subdivision thereof, or for the purpose of showing the unit to a prospective purchaser or mortgagee.

The following procedures shall be followed for the eviction of a tenant pursuant to subsection (c) of this section:

For evictions brought pursuant to subsection (c)(1)(i), the foreclosing owner shall follow §

34-18-35

;

For evictions brought pursuant to subsection (c)(1)(ii), or subsection (c)(2) the foreclosing owner shall follow §

34-18-36

;

For evictions brought pursuant to subsection (c)(1)(iii) or (c)(1)(iv); or for evictions brought where a binding purchase-and-sale agreement has been executed for a bona fide third party to purchase the housing accommodation from a foreclosing owner; or for evictions brought with respect to housing accommodations located in a premises insured by the federal housing administration as provided in subsection (a); or for an eviction brought against a tenant who fails to return the form requesting continued occupancy pursuant to subsection (b); the foreclosing owner shall follow the procedures for terminating a month-to-month tenancy set forth in §

34-18-37

, provided that any obligations of the foreclosing owner arising under the federal Protecting Tenants at Foreclosure Act of 2009, as such act is amended and extended from time to time, shall first have been satisfied; and provided, further, that in any eviction brought against a tenant pursuant to subsection (c), the tenant may raise an affirmative defense that the form was not posted or served upon the tenant as required by subsection (b).

A foreclosing owner may evict any person other than a tenant by following the procedures for terminating a month-to-month tenancy set forth in §

34-18-37

.

If a foreclosing owner disagrees with the amount of rent paid by the tenant to the foreclosing owner, the foreclosing owner may bring a claim in district court to claim that the rental charge is unreasonable and set a new rental rate. A bona fide lease or bona fide tenancy between the foreclosed-upon owner and the lessee, or proof of rental payment to the foreclosed-upon owner, shall be presumed to be a reasonable rental rate.

Nothing herein shall be deemed to limit the right of any tenant to knowingly waive the provisions of this section for consideration acceptable to such tenant.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, a foreclosing owner shall be exempt from the requirement of this section if:

The foreclosing owner is headquartered in Rhode Island and maintains a physical office or offices in Rhode Island from which office or offices it carries out full-service mortgage operations, including the acceptance and processing of mortgage payments and the provision of local customer service and loss mitigation, and where Rhode Island staff have the authority to approve loan restructuring and other loss mitigation strategies; or

The foreclosing owner conducted fewer than fifteen (15) foreclosures in Rhode Island during the prior calendar year, excluding any conveyances of property by a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 486, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 513, § 2.

34-18-39.
Failure to maintain.

If there is noncompliance by tenant with §

34-18-24

materially affecting health and safety that can be remedied by repair, replacement of a damaged item, or cleaning, and the tenant fails to comply as promptly as conditions require in case of emergency or within twenty (20) days after written notice by the landlord specifying the breach and requesting that the tenant remedy it within that period of time, the landlord may enter the dwelling unit and cause the work to be done in a skilled manner and submit the itemized bill for the actual and reasonable cost or the fair and reasonable value thereof as rent on the next date periodic rent is due, or if the rental agreement has terminated, for immediate payment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-40.
Remedies for abandonment.

If the tenant abandons the dwelling unit, the landlord shall send a certified letter, return receipt requested, to the tenant’s last known address giving notice that unless a reply is received from the tenant within seven (7) days, the landlord shall re-rent the premises. If the notice is returned as undeliverable, or the tenant fails to contact the landlord within seven (7) days, the landlord shall make reasonable efforts to rent the premises at a fair rental. If the landlord rents the dwelling unit for a term beginning before the expiration of the rental agreement, the tenancy terminates as of the date of the new tenancy. If the landlord fails to use reasonable efforts to rent the dwelling unit at fair rental, or if the landlord accepts the abandonment as a surrender, the rental agreement is deemed to be terminated by the landlord as of the date the landlord has notice of the abandonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.